Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-3603
Act; purpose; legislative findings.

(1) The purpose of the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act is to ensure youth in congregate care placements receive essential support for successful transition back into their homes and communities.

(2) The Legislature finds that:

(a) Youth and families require intensive support to assist in planning, supervision, and support during the transition phase; and

(b) Planning for discharge upon entry to a facility is the best practice to ensure a successful re-entry.

Laws 2026, LB962, § 3.
December 1, 2026